Hawaii, session 2025, HB437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that enhancing economic ties between Hawaii and the Republic of the Philippines (the Philippines) presents significant opportunities for strengthening mutual economic development.  Filipinos have emerged as the second-largest ethnic group in Hawaii, representing approximately twenty-five per cent of Hawaii's population, and play major roles in all sectors of Hawaii's economy.  In addition, President Ferdinand R. Marcos, Jr. has recently emphasized the potential for expanding trade cooperation between the Philippines and Hawaii.  Assisting small businesses in developing and marketing products, focusing on strengthening economic development, expanding and diversifying trade opportunities, promoting cultural exchanges, and leveraging the Filipino community in Hawaii can enhance the economic and cultural partnerships between Hawaii and the Philippines and lead to sustained growth and mutual benefits. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of business, economic development, and tourism to establish an out-of-state office in the Republic of the Philippines. SECTION 2.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall establish an out-of-state office in the Republic of the Philippines as authorized under section 201-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of business, economic development, and tourism to establish an out-of-state office in the Republic of the Philippines. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.